Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,117
False impersonation; fraud; aiding and abetting; use of false documents; penalty.

Any person who (1) presents to the department a document which is false or of which he or she is not the rightful owner for the purpose of procuring a credential, (2) falsely impersonates anyone to whom a credential has been issued by the department, (3) falsely holds himself or herself out to be a person credentialed by the department, (4) aids and abets another who is not credentialed to practice a profession that requires a credential, or (5) files or attempts to file with the department any false or forged diploma, certificate, or affidavit of identification or qualification shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 65, p. 471;

C.S.1929, § 71-803;

R.S.1943, § 71-166;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 141;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 73;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 65;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 49;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-166;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 117.